North Dakota, session 69, SB2140.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 50-06-33 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
50-06-33. Dementia care services.
As used in this section, "dementia""client" means the condition of an individual involving loss of
memory and impairment of cognitive functions severe enough to interfere with the individual's daily
lifean individual with symptoms in alignment with mild cognitive impairment or dementia and the
individual's caregivers. The department shall contract with a private provider for a statewide dementia
care services program in each area of the state served by a regional human service center. The
dementia care services must include:
1. Identifying available services within the region;
2. Providing information to medical professionals, law enforcement, first responders, public
health officials, and the public regarding the:
a. The symptoms of Alzheimer's disease and related dementia, the;
b. The benefits of early detection and treatment, and thediagnosis;
c. Availability of treatments;
d. Research opportunities; and
e. Available services available to individuals with dementia and their caregivers;
3. Assessing the needs of individuals with dementia and their caregivers;
4. Training;
2. Providing consultation services to assess biological, psychological, social, emotional, and
spiritual needs;
3. Facilitating the referral of clients; and
4. Offering on demand training to direct care providers to manage and provide for the care of
individuals with symptoms in alignment with mild cognitive impairment or dementia;
5. Providing consultation services to individuals with dementia and their caregivers; and
6. Facilitating the referral of individuals with dementia and their caregivers to appropriate care
and support services.

S. B. NO. 2140 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2140.
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 93 Nays 0 Absent 1
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State